Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4045
Effect on existing powers of attorney.

Except as otherwise provided
in the Nebraska Uniform Power of Attorney Act, on January 1, 2013:

(1) The act applies to
a power of attorney created before, on, or after January 1, 2013;

(2) The act applies to
a judicial proceeding concerning a power of attorney commenced on or after
January 1, 2013;

(3)
The act applies to a judicial proceeding concerning a power of attorney commenced
before January 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a provision
of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the
judicial proceeding or prejudice the rights of a party, in which case that
provision does not apply and the superseded law applies; and

(4) An act done before
January 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 45.

The Nebraska Uniform Power of Attorney Act does not apply retroactively to an agent's actions prior to January 1, 2013. In re Estate of Adelung, 306 Neb. 646, 947 N.W.2d 269 (2020).

The provision of the Nebraska Uniform Power of Attorney Act governing retroactivity should be construed similarly to section 30-38,110, the comparable provision of the Nebraska Uniform Trust Code. In re Estate of Adelung, 306 Neb. 646, 947 N.W.2d 269 (2020).